Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 11 Bail of Persons Imprisoned on Civil Process

10-11-1.
Bail taken by arresting officer.

Every officer who shall so arrest any person pursuant to chapter 10 of this title, shall let the person arrested to bail, upon his or her giving sufficient surety for his or her appearance at the court to which such writ or process shall be returnable and to abide the final judgment which shall be rendered thereon.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 528; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 561, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-1

.

10-11-2.
Giving of bail bond.

Whoever shall become bail for any person may give bond to a member of the division of sheriffs, if the writ or process shall be served by the division of sheriffs; and if the writ or process shall be served by a town sergeant or constable, the bail bond in such case shall be given to the officer serving the writ or process.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 529; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 561, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-2

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 26.

10-11-3.
Bail by indorsement of process.

Instead of giving bond as provided in §

10-11-2

, the person becoming bail may indorse his or her Christian name and surname on the back of the writ or process, which shall hold him or her as bail to the same extent as if he or she had executed and delivered a formal bail bond.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 530; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 561, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-3

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 74.

10-11-4.
Bail at any time before judgment — Counties other than Providence.

Every person committed to a correctional institution in any county, except the county of Providence, by virtue of an arrest on any writ or process in any civil action, or by surrender of former bail in the same action, shall be let to bail or to new bail, as the case may be, in manner before provided, at any time before the rendering of final judgment on the original writ on which the arrest was made.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 531; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 561, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-4

.

10-11-5.
Bail in Providence county at any time before judgment.

Every person committed to a correctional institution in the county of Providence, on any writ or process in any civil action or by surrender of former bail in the same action, may be let to bail, or to new bail as the case may be, by the warden of the institution or by the officer who served the writ or process, at any time before final judgment shall be rendered on the writ on which the arrest was made, upon his or her giving sufficient surety for his or her appearance at the court to which such writ is returnable, and to abide the final judgment which shall be rendered thereon.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 532; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 561, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-5

.

10-11-6.
Bond or indorsement in Providence county.

In case bail be taken by the warden, the person becoming bail shall give bond to the warden in a penal sum equal to the damages stated in the writ; but if bail be taken by the officer who served the writ, the person becoming bail may give such bond to the officer, or may indorse his or her Christian name and surname on the back of the writ or process, which shall hold him or her as bail as in other cases.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 533; G.L. 1909, ch. 3009, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 561, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-6

.

10-11-7.
Discharge of bail by surrender of principal pending action.

Any person who shall become bail in any civil action, either by giving bail bond to the officer serving the writ therein or by indorsing the writ, or by giving bond to the warden of the adult correctional institutions, may, during the pendency of the action, discharge himself or herself as bail by bringing his or her principal into the court in which the action shall be pending and there delivering him or her into the custody of the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 258, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 375, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 565, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-7

.

10-11-8.
Discharge of bail before judgment.

A person may also, at any time before final judgment against him or her as bail, discharge himself or herself as bail in either of the two following modes:

By committing his or her principal to a correctional institution in the county in which he or she became bail or in which the writ of arrest was returnable, paying or tendering to the creditor or his or her attorney the costs, if any, which shall have accrued on the action against him or her as bail, and leaving with the warden of the institution a certified copy of the writ of arrest and the return of the officer thereon, and a certified copy of the bond given to the officer serving the writ or given to the warden of the adult correctional institutions, if either of the bonds have been given, and giving to the plaintiff, if in this state, or his or her agent or his or her attorney of record, notice in writing of the time and place of the commitment within six (6) days after making the commitment; or,

By bringing his or her principal into the court where the action against him or her as bail shall be pending, before final judgment shall be rendered thereon, after notice to the plaintiff or his or her attorney of record, paying the costs on the action against him or her as bail, the costs of the commitment of the principal and one week’s board at the institution and delivering his or her principal into the custody of court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 258, § 2; C.P.A. 1905, § 1149; G.L. 1909, ch. 324, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 375, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 565, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-8

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 54.

10-11-9.
Commitment of principal surrendered before judgment.

If the principal shall be so surrendered by his or her bail to the court in which the original action is pending, he or she shall be by such court committed to a correctional institution, and there remain to be taken in execution or to be discharged in the same manner as though committed for want of bail in the first instance, and he or she shall remain in the institution in like manner if committed by his or her bail before final judgment be rendered in the action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 258, § 3; C.P.A. 1905, § 1150; G.L. 1909, ch. 324, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 375, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 565, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-9

.

10-11-10.
Commitment of principal after judgment.

If the principal shall be committed by the bail to a correctional institution after the final judgment, or if, being surrendered by his or her bail to the court before which the action is pending against bail, he or she shall be committed by the court to a correctional institution, he or she shall there remain for the space of thirty (30) days, unless sooner discharged by order of law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 258, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 324, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 375, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 565, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-10

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 54.

10-11-11.
Discharge of principal on failure to take execution.

If the principal be not taken in execution within thirty (30) days after final judgment against him or her when committed for want of bail, or when committed by his or her bail or by the court to which his or her bail shall have surrendered him or her before such final judgment, or within thirty (30) days after he or she shall have been committed by his or her bail or by the court to which his or her bail shall have surrendered him or her, pending action against his or her bail, such principal shall be discharged from the correctional institution upon payment of prison fees. In computing the periods of time provided in this section, time during which execution is stayed shall not be included.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 258, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 324, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 375, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 565, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-11

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 54.

10-11-12.
Death of principal discharging bail.

The death of the principal before the return day of the execution against him or her shall discharge the bail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch 258, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 324, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 375, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 565, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-12

.

10-11-13.
Judgment against bail.

Whenever the principal shall avoid, so that his or her goods and chattels, real estate or other property subject to levy on execution, cannot be found to satisfy the execution, nor his or her body be found to be taken thereby, the plaintiff in the writ of arrest may bring a civil action against the bail in the same court wherein final judgment was rendered against the principal, and, in case no legal cause be shown to the contrary, judgment shall be given against the bail for the debt or damages and costs recovered against the principal, with interest and costs, and execution shall be awarded accordingly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 258, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 324, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 375, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 565, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-13

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 54.

10-11-14.
Action against bail in superior court based on district court judgment.

The plaintiff in any suit in which judgment shall be rendered in the district court, and the amount of debt, costs and interest due upon the judgment of the district court shall exceed five thousand dollars ($5000), shall be entitled to maintain an action against the bail in the superior court for the county in which the judgment shall be rendered, in which action the proceedings shall be the same in all respects as if the judgment had been rendered in the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 258, § 8; C.P.A. 1905, § 1151; G.L. 1909, ch. 324, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 375, § 8; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 565, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-14

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 54; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 22.

10-11-15.
Period after judgment allowed for action against bail.

No action against the bail shall be commenced unless it is within two (2) years next after the entering up of final judgment against the principal; provided, that if by reason of the absence of the bail from the state, service of process could not have been made within the time before mentioned, the action may be commenced at any time within two (2) years next after the return of the bail into the state. In computing the periods of time provided in this section, time during which execution is stayed shall not be included.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 258, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 324, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 375, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 565, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-15

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 54.

10-11-16.
Bail’s remedy against principal.

The bail may have remedy by a civil action against his or her principal for all damages sustained by his or her becoming bail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 258, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 324, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 375, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 565, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

10-11-16

.